Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2037.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-1410 is hereby amended to read
as follows: 32-1410. (a) (1) There is hereby established the council on
travel and tourism. The council shall consist of 17 20 voting members
as follows:
(A) The chairperson of the standing senate committee on
commerce of the senate, or a member of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate;
(B) the vice chairperson of the standing senate committee on
commerce of the senate, or a member of the senate appointed by the
president of the senate;
(C) the ranking minority member of the standing senate
committee on commerce of the senate, or a member of the senate
appointed by the minority leader of the senate;
(D) the chairperson of the standing house of representatives
committee on agriculture and natural resources of the house of
representatives commerce, labor and economic development, or its
successor committee, or a member of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(E) the vice chairperson of the standing house of representatives
committee on agriculture and natural resources of the house of
representatives commerce, labor and economic development, or its
successor committee, or a member of the house of representatives
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives;
(F) the ranking minority member of the standing house of
representatives committee on agriculture and natural resources of the
house of representatives commerce, labor and economic development,
or its successor committee, or a member of the house of representatives
appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; and
(G) elevenfourteen members appointed by the governor. Of the 11
14 members appointed by the governor, one six shall be appointed to
represent the general public and eight shall be appointed to represent
the organizations specified in this subparagraph, respectively. The
appointment of a representative of an organization shall be made from
a list of three nominations made submitted by the organization as
follows:
(i) The travel industry association of Kansas, one shall be an
individual engaged in the lodging industry and appointed from a list of
three nominations made by;
(ii) the Kansas restaurant and hospitality association, one shall be
an individual engaged in the restaurant industry and appointed from a
list of three nominations made by the Kansas restaurant and hospitality
association, one shall be appointed from a list of three nominations
made by for two representatives, one whose nominees shall be
individuals engaged in the lodging industry and the second whose
nominees shall be individuals engaged in the restaurant industry;
(iii) the petroleum marketers and convenience store association of
Kansas, one shall be appointed from a list of three nominations by;
(iv) the Kansas sport hunting association and six shall be
appointed to represent the general public;
(v) the national independent venue association, whose nominees
shall be Kansas residents;
(vi) the Kansas museums association; and
(vii) the Kansas sampler foundation.
(2) In addition to the voting members of the council, four
members of the council shall serve ex officio: The secretary of
commerce, the secretary of transportation, the secretary of wildlife and

HOUSE BILL No. 2037—page 2
parks and the executive director of the state historical society. Each ex
officio member of the council may designate an officer or employee of
the state agency of the ex officio member to serve on the council in
place of the ex officio member. The ex officio members of the council,
or their designees, shall be nonvoting members of the council and shall
provide information and advice to the council.
(b) Legislator members shall be appointed for terms coinciding
with the terms for which such members are elected. Of the 11 members
first appointed by the governor, six shall be appointed for terms of three
years and five shall be appointed for terms of two years as determined
by the governor. Thereafter, All members appointed by the governor
shall be appointed for terms of three years. All members appointed to
fill vacancies in the membership of the council and all members
appointed to succeed members appointed to membership on the council
shall be appointed in like manner as that provided for the original
appointment of the member succeeded.
(c) On July 1 of each year, the council shall elect a chairperson
and vice-chairperson vice chairperson from among its members. The
council shall meet at least four times each year at the call of the
chairperson of the council. Nine Eleven voting members of the council
shall constitute a quorum.
(d) Members of the council attending meetings of such council, or
attending a subcommittee meeting thereof authorized by such council,
shall be paid amounts for mileage as provided in K.S.A. 75-3223(c),
and amendments thereto, or a lesser amount as determined by the
secretary of commerce. Amounts paid under this subsection to ex
officio members of the council, or their designees, shall be from
appropriations to the state agencies, of which such members are
officers or employees, upon warrants of the director of accounts and
reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by the chief
administrative officers of such agencies. Amounts paid under this
subsection to voting members of the council shall be from moneys
available for the payment of such amounts upon warrants of the
director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved
by the chairperson of the council.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-1420 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 32-1420. (a) There is hereby established a state matching grant
program to provide assistance in the promotion of tourism and
development of quality tourist attractions within the state of Kansas.
Grants awarded under this program shall be limited to not more than
40% of the cost of any proposed project. Applicants shall not utilize
any state moneys to meet the matching requirements under the
provisions of this program. Both public and private entities shall be
eligible to apply for a grant under the provisions of this act. Not less
than 75% of all moneys granted under this program shall be allocated
to public entities or entities exempt from taxation under the provisions
of 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code of 1986, and
amendments thereto. No more than 20% of moneys granted to public or
nonprofit entities shall be granted to any single such entity.
Furthermore, no more than 20% of moneys granted to private entities
shall be granted to any single such entity. The secretary of commerce
shall administer the provisions of this act and the secretary may adopt
rules and regulations establishing criteria for qualification for a
matching grant and such other matters deemed necessary by the
secretary for the administration of this act.
(b) For the purpose of K.S.A. 32-1420 through 32-1422, and
amendments thereto, "tourist attraction" means a site that is of
significant interest to tourists as a historic, cultural, scientific,
educational, recreational or architecturally unique site, or as a site of

HOUSE BILL No. 2037—page 3
natural scenic beauty or an area naturally suited for outdoor recreation,
however, except that under no circumstances shall "tourist attraction"
mean a race track facility, as defined in K.S.A. 74-8802, and
amendments thereto, or any casino or other establishment that operates
class three games, as defined in 25 U.S.C. § 2703, as in effect on July
1, 1991.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-1410 and 32-1420 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.
I hereby certify that the above BILL originated in the House, and passed
that body
HOUSE concurred in
SENATE amendments
__________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House.
Chief Clerk of the House.
Passed the SENATE
as amended
President of the Senate.
Secretary of the Senate.
APPROVED
______________________________________________________________________________
Governor.